Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 4 Discrimination

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against discriminating in use of copyrights, see §

40-13-104

.

As to prohibition against discrimination by railroads and telegraph lines, see art. 10, § 12, Wyo. Const.

As to unfair trade practices, see §

26-13-101

et seq.

Joint resolution. —

Laws 1999, House Joint Resolution No. 1, §§ 1 through 5, requests Congress to enforce trade violations against any countries unlawfully exporting cattle or lambs in an effort to protect the state from unfair competition.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

32 Am. Jur. 2d Fair Trade Laws § 1 et seq.; 54 Am. Jur. 2d Monopolies, Restraints of Trade and Unfair Trade Practices §§ 190 to 242.

Covenants to reimburse former employer for lost business, 52 ALR4th 139.

Recovery of anticipated lost profits of new business: post-1965 cases, 55 ALR4th 507.

Coverage of leases under state consumer protection statutes, 89 ALR4th 854.

Time when cause of action accrues for civil action under state antitrust, monopoly or restraint of trade statutes, 90 ALR4th 1102.

Prohibition of interlocking directorates between competing corporations under Section 8 of Clayton Act (15 USC § 19), 60 ALR Fed 129.

What constitutes impairment of proposed intervenor's interest to support intervention as matter of right under Rule 24(a)(2) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure in antitrust actions, 78 ALR Fed 385.

58 C.J.S. Monopolies § 1 et seq.; 87 C.J.S. Trademarks, Tradenames and Unfair Competition §§ 382 to 414.

§ 40-4-101.
What constitutes unfair discrimination; penalty; exceptions.

Any person, firm, corporation, foreign or domestic, or other entity doing business in the state of Wyoming shall not:

Make, enter into, form or become a party to any plan, contract, agreement, conspiracy, asset acquisition, consolidation, merger or combination of any kind whatsoever to prevent or substantially lessen competition, create a monopoly or to control or influence production or prices thereof; or

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Monopolize, attempt to monopolize or combine or conspire to monopolize any part of trade or commerce.

Any person, firm, corporation or other entity violating subsection (a) of this section is guilty of unfair discrimination and any agreement, contract, whether express or implied, or any provision of an agreement or contract violating subsection (a) of this section is illegal and void to the extent it violates subsection (a) of this section.

This chapter shall not:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Prevent the sale of goods at commercial discounts customary in the sale of the goods;

Prohibit cooperative agreements for antitrust exceptions approved and operating pursuant to W.S.

35-24-101

through

35-24-116

;

Prohibit the development, agreement on and use of standards designed to permit or encourage competition or interoperability among products or services, provided the standards do not include provisions fixing or colluding on the prices or colluding to prevent competition by limiting the availability of the products or services;

Prohibit any person, firm, corporation or other entity from entering into any agreement or contract with a customer which specifies the price charged, or the services furnished, to the customer, or which gives discounts or additional services to the customer for purchasing specified volumes or multiple products of the same or similar product or service; or

Prohibit any person, firm, corporation or other entity from offering a customer loyalty program.

As used in this chapter, “this act” means W.S.

40-4-101

through

40-4-123

.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 62, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4372; Laws 1923, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 117-201; C.S. 1945, § 39-401; W.S. 1957, § 40-18; Laws 1995, ch. 200, § 2; 2009, ch. 172, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2021 ch. 77, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), inserted “or other entity” preceding “doing business”; in (a)(i), inserted “contract” following “any plan” and inserted “merger” following “consolidation”; in (b), inserted “or other entity” following “corporation” and added the language beginning with “and any agreement” at the end; repealed (a)(ii), which forbade businesses from selling commodities at different prices in different parts of the state to destroy competition or to gain unjust profits; repealed (a)(iii), which forbade businesses from charging more within the state for commodities produced in the state than is charged for such commodities in other states; repealed (c)(i), which read “Apply to any case where by reason of different railroad rates or other natural things in favor of any manufacturer or dealer of goods of this or another state, the manufacturer or dealer sells at a different price than he does to another in order to meet the competitive dealer”; repealed (c)(ii), which read “Apply to any case where any manufacturer of or dealer in goods manufactured or produced in this state sells products in one (1) place cheaper than in another to meet upon the same or more favorable basis any competition from foreign states or this state”; in (c)(iii), deleted “proper” preceding “commercial discounts” and substituted “the goods” for “such particular goods”; added (c)(v) through (c)(vii); and added (d).

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "; definitions" in the section heading; deleted "and engaged in the production, manufacture, sale or distribution of any commodity in general use," following "Wyoming" in (a); in (a)(i), added "conspiracy, asset acquisition," "or substantially lessen," ", create a monopoly," "or" at the end, made a related change; added (a)(iv); and substituted "40-4-123" for "40-4-105,

40-4-107

,

40-4-109

,

40-4-110

and

40-4-114

" in (d).

Questions for trial court. —

Where petition alleged defendant violated statute by charging higher prices within state than in adjoining states and by making agreement to prevent competition and control prices, questions raised by demurrer as to whether petition stated cause of action and effect of federal acts were to be solved by district court before constitutional questions could be reserved. State ex rel. Lee v. Continental Oil Co., 48 Wyo. 152, 43 P.2d 686,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1935).

Cited

in

Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962); Veile v. Martinson, 258 F.3d 1180,

2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 17097

(10th Cir. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of state antitrust laws to activities or practices of real-estate agents or associations, 22 ALR4th 103.

Enforceability of covenant not to compete involving radio or television personality, 36 ALR4th 1139.

Provisions of insurance company's contract with independent insurance agent restricting competitive placements by agent as illegal restraint of trade under state law, 42 ALR4th 1072.

Propriety, under state law, of manufacturer's or supplier's refusal to sell medical product to individual physician, hospital or clinic, 45 ALR4th 1006.

Health provider's agreement as to patient's copayment liability after award by professional service insurer as unfair trade practice under state law, 49 ALR4th 1240.

Liability of better business bureau or similar organization in tort, 50 ALR4th 745.

Enforceability of sale-of-business agreement not to compete against nonsigner or nonowning signer, 60 ALR4th 294.

Anticompetitive covenants: aerial spray dust business, 60 ALR4th 965.

Modern status of pendent federal jurisdiction, under 28 USC § 1338(b), over state claim of unfair competition when joined with related claim under federal patent laws, 57 ALR Fed 418.

Modern status of pendent federal jurisdiction, under 28 USC § 1338(b), over state claim of unfair competition when joined with related claim under federal copyright laws, 58 ALR Fed 875.

Reciprocal dealing as violation of Sherman Antitrust Act (15 USC § 1 et seq.) and Clayton Antitrust Act (15 USC § 12 et seq.), 69 ALR Fed 330.

Fraudulent concealment, so as to toll statute of limitations, as presenting common question of proof in antitrust class action, 70 ALR Fed 498.

Denial by board of governors of federal reserve system of application for bank merger or acquisition on monopolization or anti-competitive grounds under § 3(c) of Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 USC § 1842(c), 71 ALR Fed 438.

“Sham” exception to application of Noerr-Pennington doctrine, exempting from federal antitrust laws joint efforts to influence governmental action, 71 ALR Fed 723.

Vertical restraints on sales territory or location as violative of § 1 of Sherman Act (15 USC § 1)—post-GTE Sylvania cases, 92 ALR Fed 436.

What constitutes “state action” rendering public official's participation in private antitrust activity immune from application of federal antitrust laws, 109 ALR Fed 758.

§ 40-4-102.
Duty of attorney general and county attorney upon complaint. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 62, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4373; R.S. 1931, § 117-202; C.S. 1945, § 39-402; W.S. 1957, § 40-19; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 77, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-4-103.
Ouster of corporation for doing business after revocation of charter or permit. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 62, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 4374; R.S. 1931, § 117-203; C.S. 1945, § 39-403; W.S. 1957, § 40-20; repealed by 2021 ch. 77, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-4-104.
Criminal enforcement and penalties.

Any person, firm, corporation or other entity violating any of the provisions of this act shall be fined in any sum not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) per violation of this act, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

The district attorney may enforce criminal violations of this act against any person, firm, corporation or entity.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 62, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 4375; Laws 1923, ch. 86, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 117-204; C.S. 1945, § 39-404; W.S. 1957, § 40-21; 2021 ch. 77, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, "Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be fined in any sum not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both such fine and imprisonment"; and added (b).

§ 40-4-105.
Cumulative remedies.

Nothing in this act [§§

40-4-101

through

40-4-105

] shall be construed as repealing any other act or part of an act, but the remedies herein provided shall be cumulative to all other remedies, provided by law.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 62, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 4376; R.S. 1931, § 117-205; C.S. 1945, § 39-405; W.S. 1957, § 40-22.

§ 40-4-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, derived from Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 1, related to discrimination in price between localities prohibited.

Constitutionality. —

The Unfair Sales Act is a valid exercise of the police power. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

If ruinous competition is an evil, the legislature may recognize it as such and find a proper remedy for it. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

The legislature may make provision for the economic welfare of the people generally. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Restraint of trade illegal at common law. —

All combinations or agreements which unreasonably suppressed competition or restrained trade were illegal at common law as against public policy. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Journey for the Pole: The Life and Times of Fred H. Blume, Justice of the Wyoming Supreme Court,” see XXVIII Water & Land L. Rev. 195 (1993).

§ 40-4-107.
Sale at less than cost prohibited; cost defined.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, or other association engaged in business within this state, to sell, offer for sale or advertise for sale any article or product, at less than the cost thereof to such vendor, or give, offer to give or advertise the intent to give away any article or product for the purpose of injuring competitors and destroying competition.

The term cost as applied to production or manufacturing is hereby defined as including the cost of raw materials and labor and as applied to distribution cost shall mean the invoice or replacement cost, whichever is lower, of the article or product to the distributor and vendor plus any freight charges, all applicable federal, state and local taxes and any charges imposed by federal, state or local government that are not taxes that are paid by the distributor and vendor and are not included in the invoice cost.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 39-407; W.S. 1957, § 40-24; 2009, ch. 172, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), inserted “or manufacturing” following “production”, deleted “and all overhead expense of the producer” preceding and as applied”, substituted “any freight charges, all applicable federal, state and local taxes and any charges imposed by federal, state or local government that are not taxes that are paid” for “the cost of doing business”, added “and are not included in the invoice cost” at the end, and made a stylistic change; and repealed (c), which defined “the cost of doing business.”

Reasonableness of law. —

The means adopted by the legislature in furtherance of the purpose of the law cannot be considered unreasonable. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Intent clause applies to sales below cost. —

The clause “for purpose of injuring competitors and destroying competition” is applicable to sales below cost as well as to gifts. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Section not violated. —

Where merchant organized and disposed of merchandise through suit clubs making his profit on transaction as a whole, under evidence in the case, merchandising methods used did not violate this section. Eckdahl v. Hurwitz, 56 Wyo. 19, 103 P.2d 161,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1940).

Quoted

in

Kautza v. City of Cody, 812 P.2d 143,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Selling Below Cost in Wyoming,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 235 (1966).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of state statutory provision prohibiting sales of commodities below cost — modern cases, 41 ALR4th 612.

§ 40-4-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 3, related to basing cost on purchase price at forced sale.

§ 40-4-109.
Proof of intent; cost survey as evidence of cost.

In any injunction proceeding or in the prosecution of any person as officer, director or agent, it shall be sufficient to allege and prove the unlawful intent of the person, firm or corporation for whom or which he acts. Where a particular trade or industry, of which the person, firm or corporation complained against is a member, has an established cost survey for the locality and vicinity in which the offense is committed, the said cost survey shall be deemed competent evidence to be used in proving the costs of the person, firm or corporation complained against within the provisions of this act [§§

40-4-106

through

40-4-110

].

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 39-409; W.S. 1957, § 40-26.

Established cost survey. —

The “established cost survey” provided for in this section means a cost survey that is generally recognized by those engaged in the trade or industry covered as being accurate and reliable. Civic Ass'n v. Railway Motor Fuels, 57 Wyo. 213, 116 P.2d 236,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1941).

Before cost survey should be deemed competent evidence, it must be shown that it is generally accepted as truly reflecting cost of doing business for such trade or industry or the particular phase thereof involved. Civic Ass'n v. Railway Motor Fuels, 57 Wyo. 213, 116 P.2d 236,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1941).

Provision for use of “established cost survey” as competent evidence did not intend that biased, incomplete and self-serving statement of costs made with idea of furnishing evidence in litigation already in contemplation could be submitted and given credence by an impartial court of justice. Civic Ass'n v. Railway Motor Fuels, 57 Wyo. 213, 116 P.2d 236,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1941).

Survey made, not by unbiased agency, but by plaintiff itself wherein some of questionnaires returned were incomplete, involved irrelevant operations, and were made by members of plaintiff, was not established cost survey within meaning of this section. Civic Ass'n v. Railway Motor Fuels, 57 Wyo. 213, 116 P.2d 236,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 40-4-110.
Persons, agreements and transactions exempted from W.S. 40-4-107 and 40-4-109.

The provisions of W.S.

40-4-107

and

40-4-109

shall not apply to any sale made:

In closing out in good faith the owner’s stock or any part thereof for the purpose of discontinuing his trade in any such stock or commodity, and in the case of the sale of seasonal goods or to the bona fide sale of perishable goods to prevent loss to the vendor by spoilage or depreciation, provided notice is given to the public thereof;

When the goods are damaged or deteriorated in quality, and notice is given to the public thereof;

By an officer acting under the orders of any court;

In an endeavor made in good faith to meet the prices of a competitor selling the same or similar article or product in the same locality or trade area;

When the goods are sold for promotional purposes at a special sale of limited duration including but not limited to a grand opening sale, an annual anniversary sale, an annual customer appreciation sale or a community, neighborhood or mall wide sale;

In a sale of limited duration to reduce inventory, dispose of slow selling items or dispose of items replaced or to be replaced by new models;

Of any products in a class of products where the prices are identical for the same volume throughout the class provided the total revenues from all the sales of products of that class by the vendor exceed the costs as defined in W.S.

40-4-107

. For pharmaceuticals, for the purposes of this subsection, prices are identical if they are identical for a supply for a defined period of time even though the physical quantities of pharmaceuticals may be different.

Any person, firm or corporation who performs work upon, renovates, alters or improves any personal property belonging to another person, firm or corporation, shall be construed to be a vendor within the meaning of this act [§§

40-4-106

through

40-4-110

].

W.S.

40-4-107

through

40-4-110

shall not apply to any person entering into a cooperative arrangement for antitrust exceptions approved pursuant to W.S.

35-24-101

through

35-24-116

.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 39-410; W.S. 1957, § 40-27; Laws 1995, ch. 200, § 2; 2009, ch. 172, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “40-4-108” following “

40-4-107

”; in (a)(iv), deleted “legal” preceding “prices”, deleted “as herein defined” following “competitor”, and added “or similar” following “the same”; added (a)(v) through (a)(vii); and in (c), substituted “40-4-107” for “40-4-106” and substituted “40-4-110” for “40-4-116”.

§ 40-4-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 6, related to secret payment or allowance of rebate prohibited.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of state statute forbidding unfair trade practice or competition by discriminatory allowance of rebates, commissions, discounts or the like, 41 ALR4th 675.

§ 40-4-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 7, related to duty of attorney general and county attorney upon complaint of discrimination between localities.

§ 40-4-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 8, related to contracts made in violation of W.S.

40-4-106

through 40-4-116.

§ 40-4-114.
Enjoining violations; recovery of damages.

Any person, firm, private corporation or trade association, having a reasonably foreseeable physical and economic causal nexus to the specific act or acts alleged to be a violation, may maintain an action to enjoin a continuance of any act or acts in violation of this act [§§

40-4-106

through

40-4-110

].

Any injured person may maintain an action for violation of this act against the alleged violator to recover the actual damages sustained by the injured person together with reasonable attorneys fees and costs.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 39-414; W.S. 1957, § 40-31; Laws 2006, ch. 89, § 1; 2009, ch. 172, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), inserted “having a reasonably foreseeable physical and economic causal nexus to the specific act or acts alleged to be a violation,” deleted “and, if injured thereby, for the recovery of damages of and from the defendants named in the action” at the end; inserted (b) through (d) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), deleted “firm, private corporation or trade association” following “Any injured person” and substituted “for violation of this act against the alleged violator to recover the actual damages sustained by the injured person together with reasonable attorneys fees and costs” for “against the alleged violator of W.S. 40-4-101(a)(i) to recover three (3) times the actual damages sustained, together with costs, where there is a reasonably foreseeable physical and economic causal nexus between the injury and the violation”; repealed (c) through (g), which related to actions where both direct and indirect purchasers are involved, the entitlement of the defendant, damages, violations of the provisions,
prosecution, and defendant's testimony.

Injunction was properly denied

where evidence in suit to enjoin merchant from using merchandising methods which allegedly violated unfair competition and lottery statutes was insufficient to show that competitor was especially injured or that it would cause multiplicity of suits, and where speedy remedy at law by criminal prosecution was available. Eckdahl v. Hurwitz, 56 Wyo. 19, 103 P.2d 161,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

Veile v. Martinson, 258 F.3d 1180, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 17097 (10th Cir. 2001).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“Target area” doctrine as basis for determining standing to sue under § 4 of Clayton Act (15 USC § 15) allowing treble damages for violation of antitrust laws, 70 ALR Fed 637.

Application of fraudulent concealment doctrine to statute of limitations in antitrust case (15 USC § 15b), 72 ALR Fed 430.

Divestiture as available relief under § 16 of Clayton Act (15 USC § 26) in action by private parties, 77 ALR Fed 509.

Standing of private party under § 16 of Clayton Act (15 USC § 26) to seek injunction to prevent merger or acquisition allegedly prohibited under § 7 of the act (15 USC § 18), 78 ALR Fed 159.

Propriety of preliminary injunctive relief in private antitrust actions involving dealership terminations, 79 ALR Fed 44.

§ 40-4-114.1.
Civil investigations by the attorney general.

Whenever the attorney general has probable cause to believe that any person, firm, corporation or other entity, whether foreign or domestic, has engaged in or is engaging in a violation of any provision of this act or of any provision of federal antitrust law that may be enforced by the attorney general, the attorney general may initiate an investigation. As part of any investigation under this section, the attorney general may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, documents or other matters, propound interrogatories to be answered in writing under oath and collect evidence. Any interrogatory or subpoena served under this subsection shall inform the party served of the right to file a petition as provided by subsection (b) of this section.

Not later than five (5) business days after the service of any interrogatory or subpoena or at any time before the return date specified in the interrogatory or subpoena, the party served under this section may file in the district court in the county in which the party resides, the district court in the county where the party transacts business or the district court in Laramie county a petition for an order modifying or setting aside the interrogatory or subpoena. Any petition filed under this subsection shall be served upon the attorney general. The petitioner may raise any objection or privilege that would be available under this act or upon service of a subpoena in a civil action.

If any matter that the attorney general seeks to obtain by subpoena is not located within Wyoming and is not reducible to electronic reproduction and transmission, the party subpoenaed may make the matter available to the attorney general to examine the matter at the place where it is located. The attorney general may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the matter is located, to inspect the matter on the attorney general’s behalf. The attorney general may respond to similar requests from officials of other states and may inspect a matter on their behalf.

The attorney general may apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance of any party who fails to obey a subpoena or answer an interrogatory issued under this section without lawful excuse and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected by the subpoena or interrogatory.

The attorney general may request that an individual who refuses to comply with a subpoena or answer an interrogatory on the grounds that the testimony or matter may incriminate the individual be ordered by the court to provide the testimony or matter. Except for a prosecution for perjury, an individual who complies with a court order to provide testimony or matter after asserting a privilege against self-incrimination to which the individual is entitled by law shall not have the testimony or matter provided, or evidence derived therefrom, or received against the individual used in any criminal investigation or proceeding.

Any person, firm, corporation or other entity, whether foreign or domestic, upon whom an interrogatory or subpoena is served pursuant to this section shall comply with the terms of the interrogatory or subpoena unless otherwise provided by this section or by order of the district court.

Any person who fails to appear with the intent to avoid, evade or prevent compliance, in whole or in part, with any investigation under this act or who removes from any place, conceals, withholds, mutilates, alters, destroys or by any other means falsifies any matter or documentary material in the possession, custody or control of any person subject to the request or subpoena, or who knowingly conceals any relevant information with the intent to avoid, evade or prevent compliance shall be liable for a civil penalty as provided in this subsection. The attorney general may, upon petition to the court, recover a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). If civil penalties are assessed in or as the result of any litigation, the attorney general is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs.

Whenever criminal or civil intelligence, records of investigations, investigative information or any other information held by any state or federal agency is available to the attorney general on a confidential or restricted basis, the attorney general may obtain and use the information unless otherwise prohibited by law. Any records of investigations or intelligence or investigative information that are exempt from disclosure under the Public Records Act shall remain confidential and exempt from disclosure under that act.

Any written response, testimony or document obtained by the attorney general under this section or any information derived directly or indirectly from any written response, testimony or document obtained by the attorney general shall be deemed records of investigations and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Public Records Act.

History.

2021 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 77, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-4-114.2.
Civil enforcement by the attorney general.

Whenever the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that any person, firm, corporation or other entity, foreign or domestic, has engaged in, is engaging in or is about to engage in any action or practice that is unlawful under this act, the attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state of Wyoming against that person, firm, corporation or entity to:

Obtain a declaratory judgment that the action or practice violates the provisions of this act;

Enjoin any action or practice that violates the provisions of this act by issuing a temporary restraining order, an ex parte temporary restraining order or a preliminary or permanent injunction, without bond;

Recover a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for each violation of this act or of any injunction, judgment or consent agreement issued or entered into under this act;

Obtain an order requiring divestiture of any assets:

Acquired in violation of W.S.

40-4-101

and after the court determines that divestiture is necessary to avoid the creation or continuation of a monopoly or to avoid any likely substantial lessening of competition that results from a transaction found to be in violation of W.S.

40-4-101

; or

To restore competition to any line of Wyoming commerce that has been eliminated by a violation of W.S. 40-4-101.

Recover actual damages or restitution on behalf of the state and its agencies that are injured either directly or indirectly by reason of any violation of this act.

The attorney general may bring a civil action in the name of the state of Wyoming as parens patriae on behalf of any person residing within Wyoming to secure damages or restitution for losses incurred directly or indirectly because of any violation of this act. For any action to be initiated under this subsection, the attorney general shall give notice to all persons on whose behalf the action would be initiated by publication or other means specified by the court. Any person on whose behalf a civil action would be brought may elect to have their claims excluded from the civil action by filing a notice of election with the court within the time specified in the notice by the attorney general. Any person who is represented by the attorney general in a civil action under this subsection who fails to submit a timely notice of election and for which a final judgment has been issued shall be precluded from asserting any claim or initiating any civil action that could have been brought based on the facts alleged or proven in the attorney general’s action under this subsection.

The attorney general shall recover the costs of any investigation, expert costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs if successful in any civil action initiated under this section.

In lieu of initiating or continuing an investigation or civil action, the attorney general may accept and enter into a consent agreement with respect to any action or practice alleged to violate this act. Any consent agreement may include a stipulation for the payment of civil penalties as authorized in this act, reimbursement of the attorney general’s reasonable expenses, costs and attorney fees, the payment of restitution and actual damages for Wyoming residents with an interest in the consent agreement or an agreement to abide by any injunctive provisions or prohibitions.

Any civil action brought under this section may be brought in the district court of the county in which any party resides or has a principal place of business or in the district court of Laramie county.

In addition to any action authorized by state law, the attorney general may proceed under any provision of federal antitrust law to enforce the provisions of this act.

This section shall apply only to actions initiated by the attorney general.

History.

2021 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 77, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§§ 40-4-115 through 40-4-121.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 172, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 73, § 10, related to penalty for violation of W.S.

40-4-106

through 40-4-116.

§ 40-4-122.
Requiring construction of particular building to maintain agency or dealership.

Any manufacturer, or any jobber or distributor for any manufactured product, or any salesman, agent or representative of any such manufacturer, jobber or distributor who requires, or attempts to require, of any dealer or agent residing in the state of Wyoming, who sells or services the products of such manufacturer, jobber or distributor, that such Wyoming agent or dealer construct or build any particular type or standard of building in order to maintain his agency or dealership to sell such manufactured product, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by this act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 138, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 39-422; W.S. 1957, § 40-39; 2021 ch. 77, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "punishable as provided by this act" for ", and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or shall be subject to both such fine and imprisonment" at the end.

§ 40-4-123.
Requiring purchase of accessories to maintain agency or dealership.

Any manufacturer, or any jobber or distributing agent for any manufactured product, or any salesman, agent or representative of any such manufacturer, jobber or distributor, who requires, or attempts to require, of any Wyoming agent or dealer selling or servicing the products of such manufacturer, jobber or distributor, that such Wyoming dealer or agent purchase accessories or products of such manufacturer, jobber or distributor in order to obtain other products of such manufacturer, jobber or distributor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by this act.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 138, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 39-423; W.S. 1957, § 40-40; 2021 ch. 77, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “punishable as provided by this act” for “, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or shall be subject to both such fine and imprisonment” at the end.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reciprocal dealing as violation of Sherman Antitrust Act (15 USC § 1 et seq.) and Clayton Antitrust Act (15 USC § 12 et seq.), 69 ALR Fed 330.